California statutes. Code of Civil Procedure
Unless otherwise provided in this title, Title 9 (commencing with Section 1280) shall be applicable to any arbitration proceeding undertaken pursuant to this title.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 906, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

1299.9.

(a) The provisions of this title shall not apply to any employer that is a city, county, or city and county, governed by a charter that was amended prior to January 1, 2004, to incorporate a procedure requiring the submission of all unresolved disputes relating to wages, hours, and other terms and conditions of employment within the scope of arbitration to an impartial and experienced neutral person or panel for final and binding determination, provided however that the charter amendment is not subsequently repealed or amended in a form
 that would no longer require the submission of all unresolved disputes relating to wages, hours, and other terms and conditions of employment within the scope of arbitration to an impartial and experienced neutral person or panel, for final and binding determination.

(b) Unless otherwise agreed to by the parties, the costs of the arbitration proceeding and the expenses of the arbitration panel, except those of the employer representative, shall be borne by the employee organization.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 877, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



TITLE 10. UNCLAIMED PROPERTY [1300. - 1615.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [1300. - 1306.]



  ARTICLE 1. Definitions [1300. - 1301.]

1300.

For the purposes of this title, the following definitions shall apply:

(a) “Property,” unless specifically qualified, includes all classes of property, real, personal and mixed.

(b) “Unclaimed property,” unless specifically qualified, means all property (1) which is unclaimed, abandoned, escheated, permanently escheated, or distributed to the state, or (2) which, under any provision of law, will become unclaimed, abandoned, escheated, permanently escheated, or distributed to the state, or (3) to the possession of which the state is or will become entitled, if not claimed by the person or persons entitled thereto within the time allowed by law, whether or not there has been a judicial determination that such property is unclaimed, abandoned, escheated, permanently escheated, or distributed to the state. 

(c) “Escheat,” unless specifically qualified, means the vesting in the state of title to property the whereabouts of whose owner is unknown or whose owner is unknown or which a known owner has refused to accept, whether by judicial determination or by operation of law, subject to the right of claimants to appear and claim the escheated property or any portion thereof. When used in reference to the law of another state, “escheat” includes the transfer to the state of the right to the custody of such property.

(d) “Permanent escheat” means the absolute
vesting in the state of title to property the whereabouts of whose owner is unknown or whose owner is unknown or which a known owner has refused to accept, pursuant to judicial determination, pursuant to a proceeding of escheat as provided by Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 1410) of this title, or pursuant to operation of law, and the barring of all claims to the property by the former owner thereof or his successors.

(e) “Controller” means the State Controller.

(f) “Treasurer” means the State Treasurer.

(g) “Domicile,” in the case of a corporation, refers to the place where the corporation is incorporated.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1968, Ch. 356.)
-------------------------------------------

1301.

For the purposes of this title, unless otherwise specified, (1) a reference to a section refers to a section of this code; (2) a reference to an article refers to an article of the chapter of this title in which such reference is made; and (3) a reference to a chapter refers to a chapter of this title.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1708.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Purpose and Scope [1305. - 1306.]

1305.

It is the purpose of this title to provide for the receipt, custody, investment, management, disposal, escheat and permanent escheat of various classes of unclaimed property, to the possession of which the State is, or may become, entitled under the provisions of this title or under other provision of law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1708.)
-------------------------------------------

1306.

The provisions of this title do not apply to money or other property held by the State or any officer thereof as trustee or bailee under the terms of an express contract to which the State or any officer thereof is a party.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1708.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Receipt and Expenditure of Funds [1310. - 1325.]



  ARTICLE 1. Deposit of Unclaimed Property [1310. - 1321.]

1310.

Whenever, under the provisions of this title or under any other provision of law, unclaimed money or other unclaimed property is payable into the State Treasury, the person responsible for making such payment shall, if it is cash, transmit it to the Treasurer, and if it is personal property other than cash, transmit it to the Controller for deposit in the State Treasury.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1708.)
-------------------------------------------

1311.

Any person transmitting money or other property to the Treasurer or Controller under the provisions of this title shall, at the time of such transmittal, furnish written notice thereof to the Controller, setting forth the amount of cash transmitted, the nature and description of the personal property other than cash transmitted, the name and last known address of the person entitled to such property or for whose benefit such property is transmitted, a reference to the specific statutory provision under which such property is transmitted, and if such property represents the proceeds of an estate of a decedent, or an unclaimed amount payable pursuant to an allowed and
approved claim against such an estate, the name of the decedent, the county and court in which probate or escheat proceedings, if any, were held, the number of the action, if any; and, in the case of all classes of property so transmitted, such other identifying information available from the records of the person making such transmittal, as the Controller may require.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1708.)
-------------------------------------------

1312.

Whenever money or other property is paid to the State or any officer or employee thereof under the provisions of this title, and such money or other property has been covered by a decree of distribution in a decedent’s estate, or by an order or decree of a court ordering such payment or adjudging that title to such property has vested in the State, the person transmitting such money or other property to the Treasurer or Controller shall, at the time of such transmittal, furnish to the Controller a certified copy of each court order or decree, and of each court order correcting or amending the same, covering such money or other property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1708.)
-------------------------------------------

1313.

A fund is hereby created in the State Treasury, to be known as the Unclaimed Property Fund.

All money, except permanently escheated money, paid to the state or any officer or employee thereof for deposit in the State Treasury under the provisions of this title shall, on order of the Controller, be deposited in the Unclaimed Property Fund.

All property other than money, including the proceeds from the sale or other disposition thereof, except permanently escheated property received by, or coming into the possession of, the state or any officer or employee thereof under the provisions of
this title shall, on order of the Controller, be deposited in the State Treasury to be held in the Unclaimed Property Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1183.)
-------------------------------------------

1314.

The Controller shall maintain a separate account in the Unclaimed Property Fund covering the accountability for money deposited in the Unclaimed Property Fund under each article of Chapter 6. All real and personal property distributed to the State or delivered into the possession of the State or any officer or employee thereof under the provisions of this title, shall be accounted for by the Controller in the name of the account in the Unclaimed Property Fund to which the proceeds thereof, if converted into cash, would be credited under the provisions of this title. All personal property deposited in the State Treasury under the provisions of this title shall be held by
the Treasurer in the name of the same account in the Unclaimed Property Fund for which such property is accounted by the Controller, as herein provided.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1708.)
-------------------------------------------

1315.

If unclaimed money or other property in an estate of a deceased person, or if any unclaimed amount payable pursuant to an allowed and approved claim against such an estate, is received by the State or any officer or employee thereof and deposited in the State Treasury under the provisions of this title, it shall be recorded on the books of the Controller to the credit, or in the name, of such estate, for the benefit of the person entitled thereto or his successors in interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1708.)
-------------------------------------------

1316.

If unclaimed money or other property is received by the State or any officer or employee thereof and deposited in the State Treasury under the provisions of this title for the benefit of known heirs, devisees, legatees or creditors of an estate of a deceased person, or for the benefit of known claimants, payees, or other persons entitled thereto, it shall be recorded on the books of the Controller to the credit, or in the name, of such heirs, devisees, legatees, creditors, claimants, payees, or other persons entitled thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1708.)
-------------------------------------------

1317.

The amount of each canceled warrant credited to the Unclaimed Property Fund under the provisions of Section 17072 of the Government Code shall, on order of the Controller, be transferred to the General Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1183.)
-------------------------------------------

1318.

All interest received and other income derived from the investment of moneys in the Unclaimed Property Fund, as provided in Section 13470 of the Government Code, shall, on order of the Controller, be deposited in the General Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1183.)
-------------------------------------------

1319.

Except as otherwise provided in Section 1318, all rents, interest, dividends or other income or increment derived from real or personal property received and held by the State in the name of the Unclaimed Property Fund under the provisions of this title shall, on order of the Controller, be deposited in the Unclaimed Property Fund, and shall be credited by the Controller to the account maintained by him, in the name of which such property is accounted, as provided in Chapter 2. Any moneys deposited in the Unclaimed Property Fund under the provisions of this section shall be held for the benefit of the person or persons entitled to the property from which such moneys were
derived, or their successors in interest; and shall be subject to claim in the same manner as such property may be claimed; but the period in which such moneys shall be available for claim by and payment to the person or persons entitled thereto shall not extend beyond the period in which the property from which such moneys were derived is available for claim and payment under the provisions of this title.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1708.)
-------------------------------------------

1320.

Except as otherwise provided in Section 1318, all rents, interest, dividends or other income or increment derived from real or personal property that has permanently escheated to the state, shall, on order of the Controller, be deposited in the General Fund.

All moneys deposited in the General Fund under the provisions of this section shall be deemed to have permanently escheated to the state as of the date of permanent escheat of the property from which such moneys were derived.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1183.)
-------------------------------------------

1321.

Any person delivering money or other property to the Treasurer or Controller under the provisions of this title shall, upon such delivery, be relieved and held harmless by the State from all or any claim or claims which exist at that time with reference to such money or other property, or which may thereafter be made, or which may come into existence, on account of, or in respect to, such money or other property.

No action shall be maintained against any person who is the holder of such money or other property, nor against any officer as agent thereof, for:

(a) The
recovery of such money or other property delivered to the Treasurer or Controller pursuant to this title, or for interest thereon subsequent to the date of the report thereof, if any, to the Controller; or

(b) Damages alleged to have resulted from such delivery to the Treasurer or Controller.

No owner of money or other property shall be entitled to receive interest thereon or with respect thereto from and after the date on which a report of such money or other property is made to the Controller pursuant to any provision of this title, whether or not he was entitled to such interest prior to such report. 

As used in this section, “person” and “holder” have the respective meanings set forth in Section 1461 of this code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 279.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Appropriation [1325. - 1325.]

1325.

Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, all money in the Unclaimed Property Fund is hereby continuously appropriated to the Controller, without regard to fiscal years, for expenditure for any of the following purposes:

(a) For refund, to the person making such deposit, of amounts, including overpayments, deposited in error in such fund.

(b) For payment of the cost of title searches and appraisals incurred by the
Controller covering real or personal property held in the name of an account in such fund.

(c) For payment of the cost incurred by the Controller covering indemnity bonds required in order to have duplicate certificates of ownership issued in order to replace lost certificates, covering personal property held in the name of an account in such fund.

(d) For payment of amounts required to be paid by the state as trustee, bailee, or successor in interest to the preceding owner, pursuant to the provisions of trust deeds, mortgages, or other liens on real property held in the name of an account in such fund.

(e) For payment of costs incurred by the Controller for the repair, maintenance and upkeep of real and personal property held in the name of an account in such fund.

(f) For payment of costs of official advertising in connection with the sale of real or personal property held in the name of an account in such fund.

(g) For payment to taxing agencies of the amounts deducted by the Controller from allowed and approved claims, in accordance with the provisions of subdivision (c) of Section 4986.5 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(h) For transfer to the Inheritance Tax Fund, on order of the Controller, of the amount of any inheritance taxes determined to be due and payable to the state by any claimant, with respect to any real or personal property, including cash, claimed by that person under the provisions of this title.

(i) For payment and delivery to claimants of money or other property held to the credit, or in the name, of an account in such fund, under the
provisions of this title.

(j) For transfer to the General Fund, on order of the Controller, of any money or other property in the Unclaimed Property Fund which becomes permanently escheated to the state under the provisions of this title.

Any expenditure made by the Controller pursuant to the provisions of this section shall be charged against any balance credited to the particular account in the Unclaimed Property Fund, in the name of which is held the real or personal property for which the expenditure is made; and if sufficient balance is not available in such account, the expenditure may be made from any appropriation from the General Fund for the support of the Controller, or, in the case of official advertising, from any appropriation available therefor, to be reimbursed from the proceeds of any subsequent sale of the property for which such expenditure is made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 692, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Payment of Claims [1335. - 1355.]



  ARTICLE 1. General [1335. - 1335.]

1335.

When payment or delivery of money or other property has been made to any claimant under the provisions of this chapter, no suit shall thereafter be maintained by any other claimant against the State or any officer thereof for or on account of such property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1708.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Refund of Erroneous Receipts [1345. - 1347.]

1345.

If any person has erroneously delivered any unclaimed moneys or other unclaimed property to the state or any officer or employee thereof, and the moneys or other property is deposited in the Unclaimed Property Fund or is held by the Controller or Treasurer in the name of any account in that fund pursuant to this title, the moneys or other property delivered in error may be refunded or returned to that person on order of the
Controller.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 31, Sec. 11.   (SB 836)   Effective June 27, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

1346.

If any person has erroneously delivered any unclaimed moneys or other unclaimed property to the state or any officer or employee thereof, and the moneys or other property is deposited in, or transferred to, the General Fund, or is held by the Controller or Treasurer in the name of that fund, pursuant to this title, the moneys or other property delivered in error, if cash, shall on order of the Controller, be transferred
from the General Fund to the Unclaimed Property Fund, and, if other than cash, the records of the Controller and Treasurer shall be adjusted to show that it is held in the name of the proper account in the Unclaimed Property Fund; and the moneys or other property may be refunded or returned to that person on order of the Controller.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 31, Sec. 12.   (SB 836)   Effective June 27, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

1347.

Whenever money deposited in the Unclaimed Property Fund is transferred to the General Fund under the provisions of this title, and whenever the records of the Controller and Treasurer covering property other than money held in the name of any account in the Unclaimed Property Fund are adjusted to record such property as held in the name of the General Fund, as permanently escheated property under the provisions of this title, if it is subsequently determined that such money or other property is not, in fact, permanently escheated, such money or other property, if cash, shall, on order of the Controller, be retransferred from the General Fund to the Unclaimed Property
Fund; and, if the property is other than money, the records of the Controller and Treasurer shall be adjusted to show that it is held in the name and for the benefit of the proper account in the Unclaimed Property Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1183.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Claims [1350. - 1355.]

1350.

Unless otherwise provided in this title, all money or other property deposited in the State Treasury under the provisions of this title may be claimed by the person entitled thereto at any time prior to the date on which such money or other property has become permanently escheated, as provided by this title.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1708.)
-------------------------------------------

1351.

Unless otherwise provided in this title, all money or other property deposited in the State Treasury under the provisions of this title, if not claimed by the person entitled thereto within five years from the date of such deposit, shall become the property of the State by escheat; and upon request by the Controller, the Attorney General shall commence a proceeding under the provisions of Section 1410, or, in lieu of such proceeding, the Controller may take action as provided by Article 2 of Chapter 5, to have it adjudged, determined or established that the title to such money or other property has vested in the State.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1708.)
-------------------------------------------

1352.

(a) Whenever unclaimed money or other property is deposited in the State Treasury under this title, and, except as otherwise provided by law, whenever there is in the possession of the state or its officers any money or other property which is held for third persons or the title to which has vested in the state subject to the rights of third persons, and the period during which it may be claimed by a person entitled thereto has not terminated, the period and person being prescribed by law, if the value of the money or other property to which the claimant is entitled is less than sixty thousand dollars
($60,000), any such person may present his or her claim for it to the Controller.

The claim shall be made in the form prescribed by the Controller, which shall set forth the information required by Section 1355 or any other information that the Controller may deem necessary to establish right or title to the money or other property in the claimant.

(b) Property assigned or distributed to a name distributee may be claimed by the distributee himself or herself or his or her legal guardian or conservator, as provided in subdivision (a) regardless of the amount. This subdivision does not apply to the heirs or estate of a distributee, or to property distributed to the state for lack of known heirs.

(c) Any person aggrieved by a decision of the Controller may commence an action, naming the Controller as a defendant, to establish his or her
claim in the superior court in any county or city and county in which the Attorney General has an office pursuant to Section 1541.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 450, Sec. 1.   Effective July 31, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

1353.

Except as otherwise provided in Sections 401 or 1352, whenever money or other property is deposited in the State Treasury under the provisions of this title, and, except as otherwise provided by law, when there is in the possession of the State or its officers any money or other property which is to be held for third persons or the title to which has vested in the State subject to the rights of third persons, the Superior Court of the County of Sacramento shall have full and exclusive jurisdiction to determine the title to such money or other property and all claims thereto.

If the period in which such money or other property may
be claimed by a person entitled thereto has not terminated, such period and person being prescribed by law, any such person may file a petition in the Superior Court of the County of Sacramento, or as provided in Section 401, showing his claim or right to the money or other property or the proceeds thereof, or any portion thereof.

The petition shall be verified, and, among other things, must, insofar as they are applicable or material to the matters at issue, state the facts required to be stated in a petition filed under Section 1355. If the money or other property at issue did not come into the possession of the State or its officers in connection with estates of deceased persons, the petition shall, in addition to the foregoing facts, state any material facts necessary to establish a prima facie right or title in the petitioner. Upon the filing of the petition, the same proceedings shall be had as are required in Section 1355.

If, upon trial of the issues, the court is satisfied of the claimant’s right or title to the money or other property claimed, it shall grant him a certificate to that effect under its seal. Upon presentation of such certificate, the Controller shall draw his warrant on the Treasurer for the amount of money covered thereby; and if the certificate covers any property other than money, a certified copy of the certificate filed with the officer of the State having possession of the property shall serve as sufficient authority to the officer for the delivery of such property to the claimant.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1708.)
-------------------------------------------

1354.

Whenever any claim is made or petition filed by the representative of an estate or other person, under the provisions of this chapter, or under any other provision of law, to recover money or other property deposited in the State Treasury or held by the State or any officer thereof to the credit, or in the name, of any account in the Unclaimed Property Fund, no recovery will be allowed unless it affirmatively appears that there are heirs or legatees who will receive such money or other property or creditors of the deceased owner of the claim whose claims are valid and are not barred, and whose claims were in existence prior to the death of such deceased owner of the claim.
Where only creditors exist, and there are no heirs or legatees, said claims shall be allowed only to the extent necessary to pay such claims and the reasonable costs of administration of the estate, including court costs, administrator’s fees and attorney’s fees. This section shall apply to all claims which are pending at the time that this section goes into effect as well as to claims arising hereafter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1708.)
-------------------------------------------

1355.

Within five years after date of entry of judgment in any proceeding had under the provisions of Chapter 5, or within five years after completion of notice by publication in an escheat action taken under the provisions of Section 1415, a person not a party or privy to such proceeding or action, if not otherwise barred, may file a petition in the Superior Court of the County of Sacramento, or as provided in Section 401, showing his claim or right to the money or other property, or the proceeds thereof.

Said petition shall be verified; and, in a proceeding for the recovery by the petitioner as heir, devisee, or legatee, or the
successor in interest of an heir, devisee or legatee, of money or other property received by the State from the estate of a decedent under the provisions of Article 1 of Chapter 6, such petition, among other things must state:

The full name, and the place and date of birth of the decedent whose estate, or any part thereof, is claimed.

The full name of such decedent’s father and the maiden name of his mother, the places and dates of their respective births, the place and date of their marriage, the full names of all children the issue of such marriage, with the date of birth of each, and the place and date of death of all children of such marriage who have died unmarried and without issue.

Whether or not such decedent was ever married, and if so, where, when and to whom.

How, when and where such marriage, if any, was dissolved.

Whether or not said decedent was ever remarried, and, if so, where, when and to whom.

The full names, and the dates and places of birth of all lineal descendants, if any, of said decedent; the dates and places of death of any thereof who died prior to the filing of such petition; and the places of residence of all who are then surviving, with the degree of relationship of each of such survivors to said decedent.

Whether any of the brothers or sisters of such decedent every married, and, if so, where, when and whom.

The full names, and the places and dates of birth of all children who are the issue of the marriage of any such brother or sister of the decedent, and the date and place of death of all deceased nephews and nieces of said decedent.

Whether or not said decedent, if of foreign birth, ever
became a naturalized citizen of the United States, and, if so, when, where, and by what court citizenship was conferred.

The post-office names of the cities, towns or other places, each in its appropriate connection, wherein are preserved the records of the births, marriages and deaths hereinbefore enumerated, and, if known, the title of the public official or other person having custody of such records.

The nationality of each of the heirs of the decedent.

The street address of each of the heirs of the decedent.

If, for any reason, the petitioner is unable to set forth any of the matters or things hereinbefore required, he shall clearly state such reason in his petition.

At least 20 days before the hearing of the petition, a copy of the petition and notice of hearing must be served on the
Attorney General and on the Controller, and the Attorney General may answer the same at his discretion.

If such claim includes a claim to real property or any interest therein, the petitioner shall record in the office of the county recorder of the county in which the real property is situated, a notice of the pendency of the petition containing the object of the action and a description of the property in the county affected thereby. From the time of filing such notice for record only, shall a purchaser or encumbrancer of the property be deemed to have constructive notice of the pendency of the action, and only of its pendency against parties designated by their real names.

The court must thereupon try the issue as issues are tried in civil actions; and if it is determined that such person is entitled to the money or other property or the proceeds thereof, it must order the property, if it has not been sold, to be
delivered to him, or if it has been sold and the proceeds thereof paid into the State Treasury, it must order the Controller to draw his warrant on the Treasurer for the payment of the same, but without interest or cost to the State. A copy of such order, under the seal of the court, shall be a sufficient voucher for drawing such warrant.

All persons who fail to appear and file their petitions within the time limited are forever barred; saving, however, to infants and persons of unsound mind, the right to appear and file their petitions at any time within the time limited, or within one year after their respective disabilities cease.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1738.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Management of Unclaimed Property [1360. - 1394.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [1360. - 1361.]

1360.

For the purposes of this chapter, the following definitions shall apply:

(a) “Personal property” means personal property falling within the definition of “unclaimed property” under the provisions of this title;

(b) “Real property” means real property falling within the definition of “unclaimed property” under the provisions of this title;

(c) “Securities” includes stocks, bonds, notes, debentures, certificates of deposit, shares, and all other evidences of ownership or
indebtedness, and all forms of chose in action and the interests in property represented thereby, falling within the definition of unclaimed property under the provisions of this title.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1708.)
-------------------------------------------

1361.

The care and custody of all property delivered to the Treasurer or Controller pursuant to this title is assumed by the State for the benefit of those entitled thereto, and the State is responsible for the payment of all claims established thereto pursuant to law, less any lawful deductions.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1708.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Powers of the Controller [1365. - 1365.]

1365.

In connection with all unclaimed property, the Controller has all of the powers necessary in order to safeguard and conserve the interests of all parties, including the State, having any vested or expectant interest in such unclaimed property. His powers include, but are not limited to, the authority to incur obligations the payment of which is authorized by the provisions of Section 1325.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1708.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Sale or Disposal of Property [1370. - 1382.]

1370.

The Controller may sell or lease personal property at any time, and in any manner, and may execute those leases on behalf and in the name of the State of California.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 31, Sec. 13.   (SB 836)   Effective June 27, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

1371.

The Controller may sell, cash, redeem, exchange, or otherwise dispose of any securities and all other classes of personal property, and may sell, cash, redeem, exchange, compromise, adjust, settle, or otherwise dispose of any accounts, debts, contractual rights, or other choses in action if, in his or her opinion, that action on his or her part is necessary or will tend to safeguard and conserve the interests of all
parties, including the state, having any vested or expectant interest in the property.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 31, Sec. 14.   (SB 836)   Effective June 27, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

1372.

The Controller may sign, endorse, or otherwise authenticate, in the name and on behalf of the State, subscribing his name, as Controller, under such writing, any securities, bills of sale, documents, or other instruments required, under customary business practice, for the consummation of the transactions authorized by this chapter. For all purposes, such endorsement is conclusive and binding against the State and the heirs, devisees, legatees, or other claimants of the property covered by such endorsement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1708.)
-------------------------------------------

1373.

The Controller may lease or sell any real property for cash at public auction to the highest bidder.

Before such sale or lease, notice thereof shall be published pursuant to Government Code Section 6063 in a newspaper published in the county in which the real property is situated, or in an adjoining county, if there is no newspaper published in such county. The notice is sufficient for all the purposes of such lease or sale if the real property is described sufficiently to identify it. The cost of publication shall be a charge against the proceeds of the lease or sale, or, if the lease or sale is not consummated, such cost shall
be a legal charge against the appropriation for official advertising.

If the value of the property to be sold does not appear to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) in the determination of the Controller, notice of sale thereof may be published pursuant to Government Code Section 6061.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 752.)
-------------------------------------------

1374.

The Controller may reject any and all bids made at sales or public auctions held under the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1708.)
-------------------------------------------

1375.

Any real property may be sold or leased by the Controller at private sale without published notice.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 31, Sec. 15.   (SB 836)   Effective June 27, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

1376.

Upon receipt of the proceeds of any sale made pursuant to this chapter, the Controller shall execute, in the name and on behalf of the State of California, a deed covering the real property, and a bill of sale covering the personal property, sold. He may execute leases for real or personal property in the name and on behalf of the State of California.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1708.)
-------------------------------------------

1377.

The Controller shall not enter into any transaction which shall create or impose upon the owners, heirs, devisees, legatees, or other claimants of the property involved, any obligation under an executory contract, the performance of which is not already an obligation of such owners, heirs, devisees, legatees, or other claimants prior to the consummation of the transactions authorized by this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1708.)
-------------------------------------------

1378.

No suit shall be maintained by any person against the State or any officer thereof, for or on account of any transaction entered into by the Controller pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1708.)
-------------------------------------------

1379.

The Controller may destroy or otherwise dispose of any personal property other than cash deposited in the State Treasury under this title, if that property is determined by him or her to be valueless or of such little value that the costs of conducting a sale would probably exceed the amount that would be realized from the sale, and neither the Treasurer nor Controller shall be held to respond in damages at the suit of any
person claiming loss by reason of that destruction or disposition.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 31, Sec. 16.   (SB 836)   Effective June 27, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

1380.

All sales, exchanges, or other transactions entered into by the Controller pursuant to this chapter are exempt from the provisions of Section 11009 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1708.)
-------------------------------------------

1381.

All sales, leases or other transactions entered into by the Controller pursuant to this chapter shall be conclusive against everyone, except a purchaser or encumbrancer who in good faith and for a valuable consideration acquires a title or interest by an instrument in writing that is first duly recorded.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1738.)
-------------------------------------------

1382.

Any provision of this article which authorizes the Controller to sell real property applies to any real property distributed or escheated to, or the title to which has vested in, the State of California by court order or decree of distribution, if such real property is held in the name of the Unclaimed Property Fund under the provision of this title, whether or not such real property has permanently escheated to the State.

This section does not apply to the disposition of tax-deeded lands under Chapter 7, 8 or 9 of Part 6 of Division 1 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 281.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Disposal of Proceeds of Sale or Lease [1390. - 1394.]

1390.
